Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2231, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Sports official. new text end new text begin (a) Whoever assaults a sports official while the official is engaged in the performance of the official's duties, and inflicts demonstrable bodily harm, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) As used in this subdivision, "sports official" means a person who serves as an umpire, referee, judge, linesperson, timer, scorekeeper, or in another similar capacity for a youth athletic activity as defined in section 121A.38, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (c) A sports official is engaged in the performance of the official's duties when the person is: new text end new text begin (1) serving in a capacity described in paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (2) on the premises or in the parking lot where the youth athletic activity is taking place; or new text end new text begin (3) traveling between the premises and a public transit stop or a motor vehicle. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end